Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB839.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2117(a), (c) and (d) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2117. Continuity of Care.--(a) Except as provided under subsection (b), if an insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan initiates termination of its contract with a participating health care provider, or if a participating health care provider 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 initiates termination of its contract, with an insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan, or if the contract expires or is nonrenewed by either party, a covered person or enrollee may continue an ongoing course of treatment with that health care provider at the covered person's or enrollee's option for a transitional period of up to [sixty (60)] one hundred twenty (120) days from the date the covered person or enrollee was notified by the insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan of the termination or pending termination, expiration or nonrenewal. The insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan, in consultation with the covered person or enrollee and the health care provider, may extend the transitional period if determined to be clinically appropriate. In the case of a covered person or enrollee in the second or third trimester of pregnancy at the time of notice of the termination or pending termination, the transitional period shall extend through postpartum care related to the delivery. Any health care service provided under this section shall be covered by the insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan under the same terms and conditions as applicable for participating health care providers.* * *(c) If an insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan terminates the contract of a participating primary care provider, or if a participating health care provider terminates its contract with an insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan, or if the contract expires or is nonrenewed by either party, the insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan shall notify every covered person or enrollee served by that provider of [insurer's or MA or CHIP managed care plan's termination of its contract] the change in the provider's network status and shall request that the covered 20250HB0839PN0869 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person or enrollee select another primary care provider.(d) A new covered person or enrollee may continue an ongoing course of treatment with a nonparticipating health care provider for a transitional period of up to [sixty (60)] one hundred twenty (120) days from the effective date of enrollment in a health insurance policy or MA or CHIP managed care plan. The insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan, in consultation with the covered person or enrollee and the health care provider, may extend this transitional period if determined to be clinically appropriate. In the case of a new covered person or enrollee in the second or third trimester of pregnancy on the effective date of enrollment, the transitional period shall extend through postpartum care related to the delivery. Any health care service provided under this section shall be covered by the health insurance policy or MA or CHIP managed care plan under the same terms and conditions as applicable for participating health care providers.* * *(g) Where an insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan has reimbursed a nonparticipating health care provider for services provided during the transitional period provided for under subsection (a) or (d) at the same rate the insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan has established for a participating health care provider, the nonparticipating health care provider may not bill the covered person or enrollee directly or indirectly or otherwise attempt to collect from the covered person or enrollee for the service provided, except for a billing to recover cost sharing at the rate established for services provided by participating health care providers, as specified in the health insurance policy or MA or CHIP managed care plan.20250HB0839PN0869 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. The following shall apply:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0839PN0869 - 4 - 123456789101112